Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202514-201
Elective officers; nomination; election; term.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the primary election for the nomination of elective officers of cities of the metropolitan class shall be held on the first Tuesday of April preceding the date of the general election, and the general election for the election of elective officers of cities of the metropolitan class shall be held on the first Tuesday after the second Monday in May 1993 and every four years thereafter. The terms of office of such elective officers shall commence on the fourth Monday after such election.

(2) Each city of the metropolitan class may, by provision of such city's home rule charter, schedule candidates for elective office of such city to be nominated at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide general election of each presidential election year.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 1, p. 419;

C.S.1922, § 3526;

C.S.1929, § 14-201;

Laws 1935, c. 78, § 1, p. 264;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-201;

R.S.1943, § 14-201;

Laws 1951, c. 30, § 1, p. 128;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 329, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 38;

Laws 1989, LB 165, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 469;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 1.